Connecticut, session 2026, SB00358.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 31-57g of the general statutes is repealed and the
2 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
3 (a) (1) "Assisted living services agency" has the same meaning as
4 provided in section 19a-490.
5 [(a) (1)] (2) "Awarding authority" means any person, including a
6 contractor or subcontractor, that awards or otherwise enters into a
7 contract or subcontract to perform (A) food and beverage services at
8 Bradley International Airport, and (B) on and after October 1, 2026,
9 services at a covered location. "Awarding authority" does not include
10 the federal government or the state.
11 (3) "Carrier" has the same meaning as provided in section 14-212.
12 [(2)] (4) "Contractor" means any person that enters into a service
13 contract with the awarding authority and any subcontractors to such
14 service contract at any tier who employs [ten] two or more persons.
15 (5) "Covered location" includes the following locations: (A)
16 Multifamily residential building or complex with fifty or more units, (B)
LCO 1 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 358
17 a commercial center or complex or office building occupying more than
18 seventy-five thousand square feet, (C) municipal office building or
19 facility, (D) electric distribution company facility, (E) gas company
20 facility, (F) public or nonpublic school, (G) cultural center or complex,
21 including a museum, convention center, arena or performance hall, (H)
22 shopping mall or bank branch, (I) industrial site, (J) pharmaceutical lab,
23 (K) airport or train station, (L) hospital, nursing home facility or
24 institution operated or managed by an assisted living services agency,
25 (M) warehouse, distribution center or other facility in which the primary
26 purpose is the storage or distribution of general merchandise,
27 refrigerated goods or other products, (N) independent institution of
28 higher education campus, (O) property owned by a carrier that is used
29 for the transportation of students or related services, and (P) data center.
30 [(3)] (6) "Employee" means any person engaged to perform food and
31 beverage services at Bradley International Airport pursuant to a service
32 contract, but does not include a person who is (A) a managerial,
33 supervisory or confidential employee, including any person who would
34 be so defined under the federal Fair Labor Standards Act, or (B)
35 employed for less than fifteen hours per week.
36 (7) "Employer" means any person that employs two or more
37 employees or service workers. "Employer" includes any municipal or
38 local government, but does not include the federal government or the
39 state.
40 (8) "Hospital" has the same meaning as provided in section 19a-490.
41 (9) "Nursing home facility" has the same meaning as provided in
42 section 19a-490.
43 [(4)] (10) "Person" means any individual, proprietorship, partnership,
44 joint venture, corporation, limited liability company, trust association or
45 other entity that may employ or enter into other contracts, [including]
46 but does not include the state. [and its political subdivisions.]
47 [(5)] (11) "Service contract" means a contract for the performance of
LCO 2 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 358
48 (A) food and beverage services by an employee at Bradley International
49 Airport, let by the awarding authority [(A)] (i) after July 1, 2001, and
50 before July 1, 2002, provided the successor contractor had actual
51 knowledge of the pendency in the General Assembly of proposed
52 legislation with content similar to this section, or [(B)] (ii) on or after July
53 1, 2002, or (B) services by a service worker at a covered location, let by
54 the awarding authority on or after October 1, 2026.
55 (12) (A) "Service worker" means a person engaged to perform any of
56 the following services:
57 (i) Care or maintenance services at a covered location, including
58 services performed by a security guard, front-desk worker, janitor,
59 housekeeper, maintenance employee, concierge, door attendant,
60 building superintendent, grounds maintenance worker, stationary
61 fireman, elevator operator or window cleaner;
62 (ii) Passenger-related security services, cargo and ramp services, in-
63 terminal passenger and baggage handling and cleaning services at an
64 airport;
65 (iii) Food preparation or dietary services at a public or nonpublic
66 school, independent institution of higher education, hospital, nursing
67 home facility or institution operated or managed by an assisted living
68 services agency;
69 (iv) Health care services at a hospital, nursing home facility or
70 institution operated or managed by an assisted living services agency;
71 and
72 (v) Student transportation services; and
73 (B) "Service worker" does not include a (i) managerial, supervisory or
74 confidential employee, including any person who would be so defined
75 under the federal Fair Labor Standards Act, or (ii) person engaged to
76 perform services related to a project that requires a permit issued by a
77 municipality, including a building, mechanical, plumbing, structural or
LCO 3 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 358
78 electrical project.
79 (13) "Successor employer" means (A) an employer that has (i) been
80 awarded a successor service contract, or (ii) purchased or acquired
81 control of a property where employees or service workers were
82 employed at any time during the previous ninety-day period, or (B) an
83 awarding authority that has hired employees or service workers to
84 perform services substantially the same to services previously provided
85 under a terminated or nonrenewed service contract.
86 [(6)] (14) "Successor service contract" means a service contract with
87 the awarding authority under which substantially the same services to
88 be performed have previously been rendered to the awarding authority
89 as part of the same program or at the same facility under another service
90 contract or have previously been rendered by the awarding authority's
91 own employees or service workers.
92 [(7)] (15) "Terminated contractor" means a contractor whose service
93 contract expires without renewal or whose contract is terminated, and
94 includes the awarding authority itself when (A) work previously
95 rendered by the awarding authority's own employees or service
96 workers is the subject of a successor service contract, or (B) the awarding
97 authority sells or transfers a property where employees or service
98 workers were employed at any time during the previous ninety-day
99 period.
100 [(b) Each contractor and awarding authority that enters into a service
101 contract to be performed at Bradley International Airport shall be
102 subject to the following obligations:]
103 [(1) The awarding authority shall] (b) (1) Not later than fifteen days
104 prior to the (A) termination or nonrenewal of any service contract, (B)
105 contracting out of services previously performed by the awarding
106 authority's own employees or service workers, or (C) selling or
107 transferring of any property where employees or service workers were
108 employed at any time during the previous ninety-day period, the
109 awarding authority shall, where applicable, give advance notice to a
LCO 4 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 358
110 terminated contractor, the employees or service workers of such
111 terminated contractor and the exclusive bargaining representative of
112 any of the terminated contractor's employees or service workers, of the
113 termination or nonrenewal of such service contract, [and] contracting
114 out of such services or the sale or transfer of such property. Such notice
115 shall be provided in writing and be posted in a conspicuous place at the
116 worksite. The awarding authority shall provide the terminated
117 contractor, employees or service workers and the exclusive bargaining
118 representative with the name, telephone number and address of the
119 successor [contractor or contractors] employer or employers, if known.
120 The terminated contractor shall, not later than three days after receipt of
121 such notice, provide the successor [contractor] employer with the name,
122 date of hire and employment occupation classification of each person
123 employed by the terminated contractor at the site or sites covered by the
124 service contract as of the date the terminated contractor receives the
125 notice of termination or nonrenewal, notice of contracting out or notice
126 of the sale or transfer.
127 (2) On the date the (A) service contract terminates, (B) the successor
128 service contract for services previously performed by the awarding
129 authority's own employees or service workers begins, or (C) the sale or
130 transfer of property occurs, the terminated contractor shall provide the
131 successor [contractor] employer with updated information concerning
132 the name, date of hire and employment occupation classification of each
133 person employed by the terminated contractor at the site or sites
134 covered by the service contract, to ensure that such information is
135 current up to the actual date of service contract termination, the actual
136 contract start date or the actual date of the sale or transfer.
137 (3) If the awarding authority fails to notify the terminated contractor
138 of the identity of the successor [contractor] employer, as required by
139 subdivision (1) of this subsection, the terminated contractor shall
140 provide the information described in subdivision (2) of this subsection
141 to the awarding authority not later than three days after receiving notice
142 that the service contract will be terminated or notice of the sale or
143 transfer of a property. The awarding authority shall be responsible for
LCO 5 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 358
144 providing such information to the successor [contractor] employer as
145 soon as the successor [contractor] employer has been selected.
146 (4) (A) [Except as provided in subparagraph (D) of this subdivision,
147 a] A successor [contractor] employer shall retain, for at least ninety days
148 from the date of first performance of services under the successor
149 service contract or from the date of the sale or transfer of a property, all
150 of the employees or service workers who were continuously employed
151 by the terminated contractor at the site or sites covered by the service
152 contract during the [six-month] ninety-day period immediately
153 preceding the termination or nonrenewal of such service contract,
154 including any periods of layoff or leave with recall rights.
155 (B) [Except as provided in subparagraph (D) of this subdivision, if] If
156 the successor service contract is terminated prior to the expiration of
157 such ninety-day period, then any [contractor] successor employer
158 awarded a subsequent successor service contract shall be bound by the
159 requirements set forth in this subsection to retain, for a new ninety-day
160 period commencing with the onset of the subsequent successor service
161 contract, all of the employees or service workers who were previously
162 employed by any one or more of the terminated contractors at the site
163 or sites covered by the service contract continuously during the [six-
164 month] ninety-day period immediately preceding the date of the most
165 recently terminated service contract, including any periods of layoff or
166 leave with recall rights.
167 (C) At least five days prior to the termination of a service contract or
168 the sale or transfer of a property where employees or service workers
169 were employed at any time during the previous ninety-day period, or
170 at least fifteen days prior to the commencement of the first performance
171 of service under a successor service contract, whichever is later, the
172 successor [contractor] employer shall hand-deliver a written offer of
173 employment in substantially the form set forth below to each such
174 employee or service worker in such employee's or service worker's
175 native language or any other language in which such employee or
176 service worker is fluent:
LCO 6 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 358
177 "IMPORTANT INFORMATION REGARDING YOUR
178 EMPLOYMENT
179 To: .... (Name of employee or service worker)
180 We have received information that you are employed by .... (name of
181 predecessor contractor) and are currently performing work at ....
182 (address of worksite) .... (name of predecessor contractor's) contract to
183 perform .... (describe services under contract) at .... (address of worksite)
184 will terminate as of .... (last day of predecessor contract) and it will no
185 longer be providing those services as of that date.
186 We are .... (name of successor [contractor] employer) and [have been
187 hired to provide] will be providing services similar to those of .... (name
188 of predecessor contractor) at .... (address of worksite). We are offering
189 you a job with us for a ninety-day probationary period starting .... (first
190 day of successor contract) to perform the same type of work that you
191 have already been doing for .... (name of predecessor contractor) under
192 the following terms:
193 Payrate (per hour): $....
194 Hours per shift: ....
195 Total hours per week: ....
196 Benefits: ....
197 You must respond to this offer within the next ten days. If you want
198 to continue working at .... (address of worksite) you must let us know
199 by .... (no later than ten days after the date of this letter). If we do not
200 receive your response by the end of business that day, we will not hire
201 you and you will lose your job. We can be reached at .... (successor
202 [contractor] employer telephone number).
203 Connecticut state law gives you the following rights:
204 1. You have the right with certain exceptions, to be hired by our
LCO 7 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 358
205 company for the first ninety days that we begin to provide services at ....
206 (address of worksite).
207 2. During this ninety-day period, you cannot be fired without just
208 cause.
209 3. If you believe that you have been fired or laid off in violation of this
210 law, you have the right to [sue us ] file a complaint with the Labor
211 Commissioner and be awarded back pay, attorneys' fees and court costs.
212 From: .... (Name of successor [contractor] employer)
213 .... (Address of successor [contractor] employer)
214 .... (Telephone number of successor [contractor] employer)"
215 Each offer of employment shall state the time within which such
216 employee or service worker must accept such offer but in no case shall
217 that time be less than ten days from the date of the offer of employment.
218 [(D) The provisions of subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this subdivision
219 shall not be construed to require a successor contractor to retain any
220 employee whose attendance and performance records, while working
221 under the terminated service contract, would lead a reasonably prudent
222 employer to terminate the employee.]
223 (5) If at any time a successor [contractor] employer determines that
224 fewer employees or service workers are required to perform the
225 successor service contract than were required by the terminated
226 contractor, the successor [contractor] employer shall be required to
227 retain such employees or service workers by seniority within each job
228 classification, based upon the employees' total length of service at the
229 affected site or sites.
230 (6) During such ninety-day period, the successor [contractor]
231 employer shall maintain a preferential hiring list of employees or service
232 workers eligible for retention pursuant to subdivision (4) of this
233 subsection, who were not initially retained by the successor [contractor]
LCO 8 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 358
234 employer, from which the successor contractor shall hire additional
235 employees or service workers, if necessary.
236 (7) Except as provided under subdivision (5) of this subsection,
237 during such ninety-day period, the successor [contractor] employer
238 shall not discharge without just cause an employee or service worker
239 retained pursuant to this section. For purposes of this subdivision, "just
240 cause" shall be determined solely by the performance or conduct of the
241 particular employee or service worker.
242 (8) If the performance of an employee or service worker retained
243 pursuant to this section is satisfactory during the ninety-day period, the
244 successor [contractor] employer shall offer the employee or service
245 worker continued employment under the terms and conditions
246 established by the successor contractor, or as required by law.
247 (c) (1) An employee or service worker, or a group of employees or
248 service workers, displaced or terminated in violation of this section, or
249 such employee's or service worker's collective bargaining
250 representative, may [bring an action in Superior Court against the
251 awarding authority, the terminated contractor or the successor
252 contractor, jointly or severally, to recover damages for any violation of
253 the obligations imposed under this section] file a complaint with the
254 Labor Commissioner. Upon receipt of any such complaint, the
255 commissioner shall hold a hearing. After the hearing, the commissioner
256 shall send each party a written copy of the commissioner's decision.
257 (2) If the [employee prevails in such action, the court] commissioner
258 finds that the awarding authority, the terminated contractor or the
259 successor employer has violated the provisions of this section, the
260 commissioner may award the employee or service worker (A) back pay,
261 including the value of benefits, for each day during which the violation
262 continues, that shall be calculated at a rate of compensation not less than
263 the higher of (i) the average regular rate of pay received by the employee
264 or service worker during the last year of employment in the same job
265 occupation classification, or, if the employee or service worker has been
LCO 9 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 358
266 employed for less than one year, the average rate of pay for the
267 employee's or service worker's entire employment multiplied by the
268 average number of hours worked per day over the last four months of
269 employment preceding the date of the violation, or (ii) the final regular
270 rate of pay received by the employee or service worker at the date of
271 termination multiplied by the average number of hours worked per day
272 over the last four months, [and] (B) reinstatement to the employee's or
273 service worker's former position at not less than the most recent rate of
274 compensation received by the employee or service worker, including
275 the value of any benefits, and (C) compensatory damages.
276 (3) If the employee or service worker prevails in such action, the court
277 shall award the employee reasonable attorney fees and costs.
278 (4) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit an
279 employee's or service worker's right to bring a common law cause of
280 action for wrongful termination against the awarding authority, the
281 terminated contractor or the successor [contractor] employer.
282 (d) Any awarding authority, [or] terminated contractor or successor
283 employer who knowingly violates the provisions of this section shall
284 pay a penalty not to exceed [one] five hundred dollars per employee or
285 service worker for each day the violation continues.
286 (e) Any party aggrieved by the decision of the commissioner may
287 appeal the decision to the Superior Court in accordance with the
288 provisions of chapter 54.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 31-57g
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (a)(5)(F), "public or private elementary, middle or high
school" was changed to "public or nonpublic school" for proper form, in
Subsec. (a)(5)(N), "college or university" was changed to "independent
institution of higher education" for proper form, in Subsec. (a)(10),
LCO 10 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 358
"including" was changed to "[including] but does not include" and "the
state and it's political subdivisions." was changed to "the state. [and it's
political subdivisions.]" for consistency; in Subsec. (a)(12)(A)(iii),
"private or public elementary, middle or high school, college or
university campus" was changed to "public or nonpublic school,
independent institution of higher education" for proper form; and in
Subsec. (b)(2)(B), "contract" was changed to "successor service contract"
for consistency.
LAB Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 11 of 11